work/esperanto.aff
flag *e:
   A	>	-A,EGA
    A	>	-A,EGAJ
    A	>	-A,EGAJN
    A	>	-A,EGAN
    A	>	-A,EGE
    A	>	-A,EG^'
    A	>	-A,EGO
    A	>	-A,EGOJ
    A	>	-A,EGOJN
    A	>	-A,EGON	# bela -> belega
   A	>	-A,ETA
    A	>	-A,ETAJ
    A	>	-A,ETAJN
    A	>	-A,ETAN
    A	>	-A,ETE
    A	>	-A,ET^'
    A	>	-A,ETO
    A	>	-A,ETOJ
    A	>	-A,ETOJN
    A	>	-A,ETON	# bela -> beleta
   O	>	-O,EGA
    O	>	-O,EGAJ
    O	>	-O,EGAJN
    O	>	-O,EGAN
    O	>	-O,EG^'
    O	>	-O,EGO
    O	>	-O,EGOJ
    O	>	-O,EGOJN
    O	>	-O,EGON
   O	>	-O,ETA
    O	>	-O,ETAJ
    O	>	-O,ETAJN
    O	>	-O,ETAN
    O	>	-O,ET^'
    O	>	-O,ETO
    O	>	-O,ETOJ
    O	>	-O,ETOJN
    O	>	-O,ETON
   I >	-I,EGI
    I >	-I,EGAS
    I >	-I,EGIS
    I >	-I,EGOS
    I >	-I,EGUS
    I >	-I,EGU	# ridi -> ridegi
   I >	-I,ETI
    I >	-I,ETAS
    I >	-I,ETIS
    I >	-I,ETOS
    I >	-I,ETUS
    I >	-I,ETU
   I	>	-I,EGO
   I	>	-I,EGON
   I	>	-I,ETO
   I	>	-I,ETON
   U >	-U,EGI
    U >	-U,EGAS
    U >	-U,EGIS
    U >	-U,EGOS
    U >	-U,EGUS
    U >	-U,EGU
   U >	-U,ETI
    U >	-U,ETAS
    U >	-U,ETIS
    U >	-U,ETOS
    U >	-U,ETUS
    U >	-U,ETU
   U	>	-U,EGO
   U	>	-U,EGON
   U	>	-U,ETO
   U	>	-U,ETON

flag *F:
    A		>	-A,E
    A		>	-A,INE
    A	>	-A,INA
    A	>	-A,INAJ
    A	>	-A,INAJN
    A	>	-A,INAN
    A	>	J
    A	>	JN
    A	>	N
#    kazoj({A	>	-A,O})
#    kazoj({A	>	-A,INO})
    A	>	-A,^'
    A	>	-A,O
    A	>	-A,OJ
    A	>	-A,OJN
    A	>	-A,ON
    A	>	-A,IN^'
    A	>	-A,INO
    A	>	-A,INOJ
    A	>	-A,INOJN
    A	>	-A,INON
    E	>	-E,INA
    E	>	-E,INAJ
    E	>	-E,INAJN
    E	>	-E,INAN
    E	>	-E,INE
    E	>	-E,IN^'
    E	>	-E,INO
    E	>	-E,INOJ
    E	>	-E,INOJN
    E	>	-E,INON	# agronome/FI -> agronomine
	# nasku -> naskintino
    O	>	-O,A
    O	>	-O,AJ
    O	>	-O,AJN
    O	>	-O,AN
    O		>	-O,E
    O		>	-O,INE
    O	>	-O,INA
    O	>	-O,INAJ
    O	>	-O,INAJN
    O	>	-O,INAN
    O	>	-O,IN^'
    O	>	-O,INO
    O	>	-O,INOJ
    O	>	-O,INOJN
    O	>	-O,INON
    O           >       -O,^'
    O	>	J
    O	>	JN
    O	>	N
